Nebraska, session 109, LB86.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB86 LB86
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $500,000 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 to the Department of Natural Resources, for Program
334, for the purpose of issuing a grant to a natural resources district
that has more than two hundred fifty watershed structures in order to
fund projects involving the operation, maintenance, or repair of such
structures. A project is eligible for grant funding under this section if
the total cost of the project exceeds thirty thousand dollars per
structure.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-